Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-4811
Agreement; mediator; powers; enforcement.

If an agreement is reached between the parties, the mediator may (1) draft a written mediation agreement encompassing the agreement, (2) have it signed by the parties, and (3) file the agreement with the farm mediation service. Any party to the mediation agreement may enforce the agreement as a legal contract.

Laws 1988, LB 664, § 11;

Laws 1997, LB 200, § 5.